tr: Fermuar çekme yönü: Çift taraflı elcik; Tek taraflı elcik; Diğer
fi: Vetoketjun vetopuoli: Kaksipuolinen vedin; Yksipuolinen vedin; Muu
cs: Strana jezdce zipu: Oboustranný taháček; Jednostranný taháček; Jiné
de: Reißverschluss-Zugrichtung: Beidseitiger Schiebergriff; Einseitiger Schiebergriff; Sonstige
hr-HR: Strana povlačenja patentnog zatvarača: Dvostrani potezač; Jednostrani potezač; Ostalo
ru: Сторона язычка молнии: Двусторонний пуллер; Односторонний пуллер; Другая
hu: Cipzár húzási oldala: Kétoldalas húzó; Egyoldalas húzó; Egyéb
zh-TW: 拉鍊頭側邊: 雙面拉頭; 單面拉頭; 其他
pt-PT: Lado do cursor do fecho: Puxador de dupla face; Puxador de face única; Outro
zh-CN: 拉链拉片侧: 双面拉头; 单面拉头; 其他
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko galvutės šonas: Dvipusis traukiklis; Vienpusis traukiklis; Kita
sl-SI: Stran drsnika zadrge: Dvostranski poteznik; Enostranski poteznik; Drugo
el: Πλευρά έλξης φερμουάρ: Λαβή διπλής όψης; Λαβή μονής όψης; Άλλο
it: Lato del cursore della cerniera: Tiretto a doppia faccia; Tiretto a faccia singola; Altro
ko: 지퍼 손슬라이더 위치: 양면 손잡이; 단면 손잡이; 기타
en: Zipper pull side: Double-sided pull; Single-sided pull; Other
nl: Kant van treklipje: Dubbelzijdige trekker; Enkelzijdige trekker; Overig
sv: Sida för dragkedjans dragtapp: Dubbelsidig kläpp; Enkelsidig kläpp; Övrigt
vi: Phía kéo của khóa kéo: Tay kéo hai mặt; Tay kéo một mặt; Khác
fr: Côté de la tirette de la fermeture éclair: Tirette double face; Tirette simple face; Autre
bg-BG: Страна на дърпача на ципа: Двустранен водач; Едностранен водач; Други
sk-SK: Strana zapínania zipsu: Obojstranné tiahlo; Jednostranné tiahlo; Iné
pt-BR: Puxador lateral do zíper: Puxador duplo; Puxador de face única; Outros
nb: Trekkside for glidelås: Dobbeltsidig glidelåsdrager; Enkeltsidig glidelåsdrager; Annet
es: Lado del tirador de la cremallera: Tirador de doble cara; Tirador de una sola cara; Otro
da: Lynlåstrækkerside: Dobbeltsidet vedhæng; Enkeltsidet vedhæng; Andet
ja: ファスナー引き手サイド: 両面スライダー; 片面スライダー; その他
ro-RO: Partea cursorului fermoarului: Cheiță cu două fețe; Cheiță cu o față; Altele
th: ด้านดึงซิป: หัวซิปสองด้าน; หัวซิปด้านเดียว; อื่นๆ
pl: Strona uchwytu suwaka: Uchwyt dwustronny; Uchwyt jednostronny; Inne